Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-4,165
Medical program; accreditation.

The department shall seek accreditation of its medical program by the American Correctional Association Commission on Accreditation for Corrections.

Laws 2001, LB 154, § 13.